lexc-files/inflections/verb/verb-infl_te.txt
!===========================
LEXICON VerbInflV
!  for verbs that end in -te
!===========================

!~~~~~~~~~~~~
! indicative
!~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ind.Intr]:^%{.f.%}u  IntrInd;
^[Ind.Trns]:^%{.f.%}a  TrnsInd;

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! participial
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~
^[Ptcp.Intr]:^%{.at.%}lghii  IntrPtcp;
^[Ptcp.Trns]:^%{.at.%}ke     TrnsPtcp;
!^[Ptcp.Intr]:^%{.at.%}ka     IntrPtcpAlternate; ! second participial mood?
!^[Ptcp.Trns]:^%{.at.%}ka     TrnsPtcpAlternate; ! ^[Jacobson (2001) p.73]

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! interrogative 
!   exhibits some fusional properties
!   so the full paradigms are given here
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^%{NULL%}   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Sg]:^%{.f.%}zi^nga Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}zin Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Pl]:^%{.f.%}a^t  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Pl]:^ste^a         Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Pl]:^tsi        Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Intr]^[3Du]:^%{.f.%}a^k  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr]^[1Du]:^ste^ung       Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Intr.2Du]:^stek       Enclitic;
!----------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------|---------------------------------------|

!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^gu     Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}a^ki    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.3Du]:^%{.f.%}a^kek    Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^tgu    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}a^tki   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.3Du]:^%{.f.%}a^tkek   Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^gnegu  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}a^gneki Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.3Du]:^%{.f.%}a^gnekek Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}zi^kun   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}zi^ngi  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.3Du]:^%{.f.%}zi^gngek Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Sg]:^ste^ggu         Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Pl]:^ste^ki         Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.3Du]:^ste^kek         Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Sg]:^ste^gnegu       Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Pl]:^ste^gneki      Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.3Du]:^ste^gnekek      Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}zi^gu    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}zi^ki   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.3Du]:^%{.f.%}zi^kek   Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Sg]:^%{NULL%}^ggu            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Pl]:^%{NULL%}^ki            Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.3Du]:^%{NULL%}^kek            Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Sg]:^%{NULL%}^gnegu          Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Pl]:^%{NULL%}^gneki         Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.3Du]:^%{NULL%}^gnekek         Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^nga    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Pl]:^%{.f.%}i^nkut  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.1Du]:^%{.f.%}i^nkung  Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^tnga   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Pl]:^%{.f.%}i^nkut  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.1Du]:^%{.f.%}i^nkung  Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^gnenga Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Pl]:^%{.f.%}i^nkut  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.1Du]:^%{.f.%}i^nkung  Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[1--.1--] forms                                                                                                                                 |
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}zi^nga   Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Pl]:^%{.f.%}zi^kut  Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Sg.1Du]:^%{.f.%}zi^kung  Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Sg]:^%{NULL%}^ngnga          Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Pl]:^%{NULL%}^kut           Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Pl.1Du]:^%{NULL%}^kung           Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Sg]:^%{NULL%}^gnenga         Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Pl]:^%{NULL%}^gneku         Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[2Du.1Du]:^%{NULL%}^gnekung        Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^ten    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}i^si    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Sg.2Du]:^%{.f.%}i^stek   Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^ten    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}i^si    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Pl.2Du]:^%{.f.%}i^stek   Enclitic;
^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}a^ten    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Pl]:^%{.f.%}i^si    Enclitic; ^[Intrg.Trns]^[3Du.2Du]:^%{.f.%}i^stek   Enclitic;
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Sg.2Sg]:^%{.f.%}zi^ken   Enclitic;                                                 |                                                  |
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Pl.2Sg]:^ste^ken         Enclitic;                                                 |                                                  |
^[Intrg.Trns]^[1Du.2Sg]:^ste^ken         Enclitic;                                                 |                                                  |
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[2--.2--] forms                                                                                                                                 |
!------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------|--------------------------------------------------|

!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
! present optative 
!   exhibits some fusional properties
!   so the full paradigms are given here
!~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~~
!--------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Sg]:^%{.at.%}li^%{NULL%}  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^nga Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr.2Sg]:^n              Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^t Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Pl]:^lte^a          Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[2Pl]:^%{.at.%}te^k Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[3Du]:^%{.at.%}li^k Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[1Du]:^lte^ung        Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Intr]^[2Du]:^%{.at.%}te^k Enclitic;
!--------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------|----------------------------------------------|

!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Sg]:^%{.at.%}li^gu     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^ki    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.3Du]:^%{.at.%}li^kek    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Sg]:^%{.at.%}li^tgu    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^tki   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.3Du]:^%{.at.%}li^tkek   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Sg]:^%{.at.%}li^gnegu  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^gneki Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.3Du]:^%{.at.%}li^gnekek Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^kun    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Pl]:^%{.at.%}la^ngi   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Sg.3Du]:^%{.at.%}la^ngak   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Sg]:^lte^ggu           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Pl]:^lte^ki           Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Pl.3Du]:^lte^kek           Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Sg]:^lte^gnegu         Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Pl]:^lte^gneki        Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[1Du.3Du]:^lte^gnekek        Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns.2Sg.3Sg]:^%{.f.%}igu          Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.3Pl]:^%{.f.%}i^ki      Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.3Du]:^i^%{.f.%}kek      Enclitic; ! typo in appendix, forgot ~f ^[Jacobson p.183]
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Sg]:^%{.at.%}e^ggu     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Pl]:^%{.at.%}e^ki     Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.3Du]:^%{.at.%}e^kek     Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Sg]:^%{.at.%}e^gnegu   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Pl]:^%{.at.%}e^gneki  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.3Du]:^%{.at.%}e^gnekek  Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Sg]:^%{.at.%}li^nga    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^kut   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.1Du]:^%{.at.%}li^kung   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Sg]:^%{.at.%}li^tnga   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^nkut  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.1Du]:^%{.at.%}li^nkung  Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Sg]:^%{.at.%}li^gnenga Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^nkut  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.1Du]:^%{.at.%}li^nkung  Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
! no ^[1--.1--] forms                                                                                                                                          |
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Sg]:^%{.f.%}i^nga      Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Pl]:^%{%.f.%}i^kut    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Sg.1Du]:^%{.f.%}i^kung     Enclitic; ! typo in appendix, forgot ~f ^[Jacobson p.183]
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Sg]:^%{.at.%}e^ngnga   Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Pl]:^%{.at.%}e^kut    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Pl.1Du]:^%{.at.%}e^kung    Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Sg]:^%{.at.%}e^gnenga  Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Pl]:^%{.at.%}e^gnekut Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[2Du.1Du]:^%{.at.%}e^gnekung Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^ten    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^si    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Sg.2Du]:^%{.at.%}li^stek   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^ten    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^si    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Pl.2Du]:^%{.at.%}li^stek   Enclitic;
^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Sg]:^%{.at.%}la^ten    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Pl]:^%{.at.%}li^si    Enclitic; ^[Opt.Pres.Trns]^[3Du.2Du]:^%{.at.%}li^stek   Enclitic;
!-----------------------------------------------------|------------------------------------------------------|-------------------------------------------------------|
